Florida, session 2026, HB169.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
11
12 Section 1. Section 457.102, Florida Statutes, is amended
13 to read:
14 457.102 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
15 (1) "Acupuncture" means a form of primary health care,
16 based on traditional Chinese medical concepts and modern eastern
17 oriental medical techniques, that employs acupuncture diagnosis
18 and treatment, as well as adjunctive therapies and diagnostic
19 techniques, for the promotion, maintenance, and restoration of
20 health and the prevention of disease. Acupuncture includes shall
21 include, but is not be limited to, the insertion of acupuncture
22 needles and the application of moxibustion to specific areas of
23 the human body and the use of electroacupuncture, Qi Gong,
24 eastern oriental massage, herbal therapy, dietary guidelines,
25 and other adjunctive therapies, as defined by board rule.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb169-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 169 2026
26 (2) "Acupuncturist" means any person licensed under as
27 provided in this chapter to practice acupuncture as a primary
28 health care provider.
29 (3) "Board" means the Board of Acupuncture.
30 (4)(5) "Department" means the Department of Health.
31 (5) "Direct supervision" means the immediate onsite
32 supervision of other Florida licensees where the acupuncturist
33 individually or collectively assumes legal liability for the
34 supervised actions.
35 (6) "Eastern Oriental medicine" means a practice that
36 employs assessment, health history, physical examination, the
37 use of acupuncture diagnosis and diagnostic techniques, the use
38 of acupuncture, electroacupuncture, Qi Gong, eastern oriental
39 massage, herbal therapy, dietary guidelines, acupoint injection,
40 and other adjunctive therapies.
41 (7)(4) "License" means the document of authorization
42 issued by the department for a person to engage in the practice
43 of acupuncture.
44 (8) "Practice of acupuncture" means to provide services
45 that apply traditional Chinese medical concepts, anatomy and
46 physiology, and modern eastern medical techniques using
47 acupuncture and eastern medicine, and the exercise of
48 prescriptive rights as provided under subsection (9) to identify
49 and evaluate and manage abnormal conditions, for the promotion,
50 maintenance, and restoration of health. The practice of
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb169-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 169 2026
51 acupuncture includes stimulation of points, areas of the body,
52 and tissues using needles and devices.
53 (9)(7) "Prescriptive rights" means the prescription,
54 administration, and use of needles and devices, restricted
55 devices, and prescription devices, and the recommendation for or
56 ordering of, or administration of herbs, homeopathics, and other
57 nutritional supplements in sterile form that are used in the
58 practice of acupuncture and eastern oriental medicine unless
59 otherwise prohibited by state or federal law or regulation. For
60 the purposes of this subsection, "herbs, homeopathics, and other
61 nutritional supplements in sterile form" includes vitamins,
62 minerals, lipids, sugars, carbohydrates, and amino acids. The
63 term does not include ophthalmic or oral inhalation drugs in
64 aqueous format, corticosteroids, antibiotics, vaccinations,
65 botulinum toxin, controlled substances as defined in s. 893.02,
66 medicinal drugs as defined in s. 465.003, or other medications
67 not used for the practice of acupuncture.
68 Section 2. Paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (2)
69 of section 457.105, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph
70 (e) is added to that subsection, to read:
71 457.105 Licensure qualifications and fees.—
72 (2) A person may become licensed to practice acupuncture
73 if the person applies to the department and meets all of the
74 following criteria:
75 (b) Has completed 60 college credits from an accredited
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb169-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 169 2026
76 postsecondary institution as a prerequisite to enrollment in an
77 authorized 3-year course of study in acupuncture and oriental
78 medicine, and has completed a 3-year course of study in
79 acupuncture and oriental medicine, and effective July 31, 2001,
80 a 4-year course of study in acupuncture and eastern oriental
81 medicine, which meets standards established by the board by
82 rule, including which standards include, but are not limited to,
83 successful completion of academic courses in western anatomy,
84 western physiology, western pathology, western biomedical
85 terminology, first aid, and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR),
86 and 60 hours of study in injection therapy. However, any person
87 who enrolled in an authorized course of study in acupuncture
88 before August 1, 1997, must have completed only a 2-year course
89 of study which meets standards established by the board by rule,
90 which standards must include, but are not limited to, successful
91 completion of academic courses in western anatomy, western
92 physiology, and western pathology.
93 (c) Has successfully completed a board-approved national
94 examination and certification process or, meets the requirements
95 for licensure by endorsement under s. 456.0145, or passes an
96 examination administered by the department, which examination
97 tests the applicant's competency and knowledge of the practice
98 of acupuncture and oriental medicine. At the request of any
99 applicant, traditional oriental nomenclature for the points must
100 be used in the examination. The examination must include a
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb169-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 169 2026
101 practical examination of the knowledge and skills required to
102 practice modern and traditional acupuncture and eastern oriental
103 medicine, covering diagnostic and treatment techniques and
104 procedures.
105 (d) Pays the required fees set by the board by rule not to
106 exceed the following amounts:
107 1. Examination fee: $500 plus the actual per applicant
108 cost to the department for purchase of the written and practical
109 portions of the examination from a national organization
110 approved by the board.
111 1.2. Application fee: $300.
112 3. Reexamination fee: $500 plus the actual per applicant
113 cost to the department for purchase of the written and practical
114 portions of the examination from a national organization
115 approved by the board.
116 2.4. Initial biennial licensure fee: $400, if licensed in
117 the first half of the biennium, and $200, if licensed in the
118 second half of the biennium.
119 (e) This subsection does not prohibit an acupuncturist
120 licensed in another state, the District of Columbia, or a
121 possession or territory of the United States from performing
122 acupuncture procedures or demonstrating equipment or supplies
123 for educational purposes at a board-approved continuing
124 education program.
125 Section 3. Subsection (3) of section 457.107, Florida
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb169-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 169 2026
126 Statutes, is amended to read:
127 457.107 Renewal of licenses; continuing education.—
128 (3) The board shall prescribe by rule continuing education
129 requirements of up to 30 hours biennially as a condition for
130 renewal of a license. All education programs must be approved by
131 the board and that contribute to the advancement, extension, or
132 enhancement of professional skills and knowledge related to the
133 practice of acupuncture, whether conducted by a nonprofit or
134 profitmaking entity, are eligible for approval. The continuing
135 professional education requirements must be in acupuncture or
136 eastern oriental medicine subjects, including, but not limited
137 to, anatomy, biological sciences, adjunctive therapies,
138 sanitation and sterilization, emergency protocols, and diseases,
139 or practice management. The board may set a fee of up to $100
140 for each continuing education provider. The licensee shall
141 retain in his or her records the certificates of completion of
142 continuing professional education requirements. All national and
143 state acupuncture and eastern oriental medicine organizations
144 and acupuncture and eastern oriental medicine schools are
145 approved to provide continuing professional education in
146 accordance with this subsection.
147 Section 4. Section 457.1085, Florida Statutes, is amended
148 to read:
149 457.1085 Infection control.—Prior to November 1, 1986, The
150 board shall adopt rules relating to the prevention of infection,
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb169-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 169 2026
151 the safe disposal of any potentially infectious materials, and
152 other requirements to protect the health, safety, and welfare of
153 the public. Beginning October 1, 1997, All acupuncture needles
154 that are to be used on a patient must be sterile and disposable,
155 and each needle may be used only once.
156 Section 5. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
157 457.116, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
158 457.116 Prohibited acts; penalty.—
159 (1) A person may not:
160 (b) Use, in connection with his or her name or place of
161 business, any title or description of services which
162 incorporates the words "acupuncture," "acupuncturist,"
163 "certified acupuncturist," "licensed acupuncturist," "eastern
164 oriental medical practitioner"; the letters "L.Ac.," "R.Ac.,"
165 "A.P.," or "D.O.M."; or any other words, letters, abbreviations,
166 or insignia indicating or implying that he or she practices
167 acupuncture unless he or she is a holder of a valid license
168 issued pursuant to ss. 457.101-457.118;
169 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb169-00